Jacob Bundsgaard is the leader of Aarhus.
The runway length of Aarhus Airport is 2702.0.
Adirondack Regional Airport is 507 metres above sea level.
Adirondack Regional Airport is located in Harrietstown, New York.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los
The runway name of Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is 14L
The runway name of Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is 14R
Afonso Pena International Airport is operated by Infraero.
Agra Airport is located in Agra.
Al Taqaddum Air Base is 88 metres above sea level.
Alderney Airport serves the city of Alderney.
The runway name of Allama Iqbal International Airport is 18R/36L.
Alpena County Regional Airport has a runway length of 1533.0.
The runway name of Alpena County Regional Airport is 1/19.
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol serves the city of Amsterdam.
Andrews County is the county seat of Andrews, Texas.
Andrews County Airport serves the city of Andrews, Texas.
The runway name of Andrews County Airport is 11/29.
The runway name of Andrews County Airport is Helipad.
Angola International Airport serves the city of Luanda.
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is located in Auckland.
Giorgos Kaminis is the mayor of Athens.
Athens International Airport is located in Spata.
German is the language spoken in Belgium.
Philippe of Belgium is the leader of Belgium.
Copenhagen is the capital of Denmark.
Lars Lokke Rasmussen is the leader of Denmark.
The Flemish Region is led by the Flemish government.
Greek is the language spoken in Greece.
Nikos Voutsis is the leader of Greece.
Harrietstown, New York is part of the United States.
Anwar Zaheer Jamali is the leader of Pakistan.
Paracuellos de Jarama is part of the community of Madrid.
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey's headquarters are the Four World
San Sebastian de los Reyes comes from Spain.
Saranac Lake, New York is part of the United States.
Stephen Dilts is the Chief of South Jersey Transportation Authority.
Aaron Bertram started performing in 1998.
Aaron Deer is associated with The Horns of Happiness.
Aaron Turner performs avant-garde metal music.
Aaron Turner performs black metal music.
Aaron Turner was born in Boston.
Abradab is associated with the musical artist Magik.
Abradab is a solo singer.
Ace Wilder was born on July 23, 1982.
Ace Wilder's record label is EMI Records.
Agustin Barboza is signed to Philips Records.
Alan Frew is associated with the band Glass Tiger.
Albennie Jones was born in Errata, Mississippi.
Aleksandra Kovac is associated with Kornelije Kovac.
Aleksandra Kovac is a solo singer.
Aleksandra Kovac performs soul music.
Alfred Garth Jones died in London.
Alfredo Zitarrosa is associated with Hilario Perez.
Alfredo Zitarrosa performs Milonga music.
Alfredo Zitarrosa's record label is Movieplay.
Alison O'Donnell started performing in 1963.
Allen Forrest performs pop music.
Anders Osborne's record label is Alligator Records.
Anders Osborne's record label is Shanachie Records.
Andrew Rayel is associated with Jwaydan Moyine.
Andrew Rayel was born in Chisinau, Moldova.
Andrew White performs alternative rock music.
Asuncion is part of Gran Asuncion.
Deram Records is located in London.
Afrobeat is a fusion genre of funk.
Gangsta rap is a sub genre of hip hop music.
Jazz originated from the blues.
RCA Records is distributed by Legacy Recordings.
Twilight is a black metal band.
The British people live in the United Kingdom.
Alan Shepard was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the United States Navy.
Alan Shepard died in California.
William Anders was the backup pilot of Apollo 11.
Apollo 14 is operated by NASA.
Apollo 8 is operated by NASA.
Buzz Aldrin is a US national.
Elliot See was a test pilot.
The University of Texas at Austin is affiliated with the University of Texas System.
Hook'em is the mascot of the University of Texas at Austin.
A.C. Milan's chairman is Silvio Berlusconi.
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada.
Abel Hernández plays for the Uruguay Olympic football team.
Abel Hernández plays for the Uruguay national football team.
Abner plays for C.D. FAS.
Adam Maher was born in Ait Ikwa, Arabic.
Adam Maher was born in Diemen.
Adam McQuaid was born in Charlottetown.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad was born in Iraq.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for PAS Teheran FC.
Akeem Ayers is a linebacker.
Akeem Priestley plays for FK Mughan.
Akeem Priestley plays for the Jacksonville Dolphins.
Al-Khor Sports Club play in the Qatar Stars League.
Alaa Abdul Zahra was born in Pakistan.
Alan Martin plays for Accrington Stanley F.C.
Alan Martin plays for Crewe Alexandra F.C.
Aleksander Barkov Jr was born in Finland.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. plays for the Florida Panthers.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. plays in the National Hockey League.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Samtredia.
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba.
Alex Plante has a height of 1.9304.
Drew Caldwell is the leader of Brandon, Manitoba.
Budapest is located in Hungary.
Inuktitut is the language spoken in Canada.
The Columbus Blue Jackets are based in Columbus, Ohio.
FC Terek Grozny's ground is in Grozny.
FC Tom Tomsk play in the Russian Football National League.
Valery Petrakov is the manager of FC Torpedo Moscow.
Dale Tallon is the general manager of the Florida Panthers.
The coach of Maccabi Tel Aviv B.C. is Zan Tabak.
Olympique Lyonnais's ground is the Parc Olympique Lyonnais.
Jorge Orosman da Silva is the manager of Penarol.
Point Fortin is located in Trinidad.
103 Colmore Row was designed by John Madin.
103 Colmore Row is located in Colmore Row.
11 Diagonal Street was completed in 1983.
200 Public Square was completed in 1985.
20 Fenchurch Street was completed in January 2009.
20 Fenchurch Street is located in the United Kingdom.
300 North LaSalle has 60 floors.
HOK SVE was the architect of the 3Arena.
The 3Arena is located at East Link Bridge.
Adare Manor was started in 1700.
Adare Manor is located in the Republic of Ireland.
The inauguration date of the Akita Museum of Art was on 28th September 2013.
The current tenants of Alan B Miller Hall are the Mason School of Business.
B V Doshi was the architect of Amdavad ni Gufa.
Ampara Hospital is located in Sri Lanka.
Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House was added to the National Register of Historic
Asser Levy Public Baths were constructed in 1904.
Birmingham is the postal code of B.
Chicago is part of DuPage County, Illinois.
Dublin is located in the Republic of Ireland.
Dublin is part of Leinster.
Sumitra Mahajan is the leader of India.
The Brazilians are an ethnic group in Japan.
Tarō Aso is the leader of Japan.
Bill Marriott is the key person of Marriott International.
English is the language spoken in the Republic of Ireland.
Cape Town is the capital of South Africa.
London is the capital of the United Kingdom.
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Paul Ryan is the leader of the United States.
Carl A Wirtanen discovered (29075) 1950 DA.
(410777) 2009 FD has an apoapsis of 259776702.47055 kilometres.
(66063) 1998 RO1 has an epoch date of November 4th 2013.
(66391) 1999 KW4 has a periapsis of 29919600000.0.
101 Helena has a mass of 3.0 kg.
101 Helena has an orbital period of 1516.6700000000003 days.
1036 Ganymed has an average speed of 16.86 km per sec.
1036 Ganymed has a temperature of 160.0 kelvins.
107 Camilla was discovered by F Vilas.
N.R. Pogson discovered 107 Camilla.
The escape velocity of 1089 Tama is 0.0068 km per sec.
1097 Vicia has a rotation period of 95040.0.
1099 Figneria has an escape velocity of 0.0155 km per sec.
1099 Figneria has a mass of 2.7 kg.
109 Felicitas has a periapsis of 283326000000.0.
109 Felicitas has a temperature of 170.0 kelvins.
10 Hygiea has an orbital period of 5.57 days.
1101 Clematis has a periapsis of 445895000000.0.
110 Lydia has an epoch date of December 31st 2006.
110 Lydia has a periapsis of 377016000000.0.
N.R. Pogson is a national of England.
Abilene, Texas has the area code 325.
Abilene is part of Texas.
Albany, Georgia is led by the Mayor.
Albany, Oregon has a total area of 45.97 square kilometres.
Albany, Oregon is in the United States.
Albuquerque, New Mexico is led by the State Senate.
Albuquerque, New Mexico is led by the Albuquerque City Council.
Amarillo, Texas is located in the United States.
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas.
Amarillo, Texas is part of the United States.
Anaheim, California has the area code 657.
Anderson, Indiana is part of Adams Fall Creek, Lafayette, Richland, Union.
Angola is part of Pleasant Township, Steuben County, Indiana.
Ann Arbor, Michigan is led by the City Administrator.
The leader of Ann Arbor, Michigan is the Mayor.
Ann Arbor, Michigan has a population density of 1580.7 inhabitants per square
Antioch, California is 13 metres above sea level.
Antioch, California is led by the Californias 11th State Assembly District.
The elevation of Arlington, Texas is 184.0 above sea level.
Atlantic County, New Jersey is in the United States.
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana.
Auburn is part of Alabama.
California is in the United States.
Atlanta is the largest city in Fulton County, Georgia.
Georgia is in the United States.
The capital of Indiana is Indianapolis.
Lee County is in Alabama.
Trenton is the capital of New Jersey.
Potter County is in Texas.
Tarrant County, Texas is in the United States.
Ann Arbor is the largest city in Washtenaw County, Michigan.
The comic character Asterix was created by Rene Goscinny.
The comic character Auron was created by Marv Wolfman.
The comic character Balder was created by Jack Kirby.
Bananaman was broadcasted by STV.
Bananaman first aired on the 3rd of October 1983.
Bill Oddie starred in Bananaman.
Baymax is a character in Big Hero 6.
Bill Everett was awarded the Eisner Award.
Bill Oddie's child is Kate Hardie.
Dan Mishkin was the creator of the comic character Bolt.
Bozo the Iron Man's full name is Hugh Hazzard.
John Buscema won the Eagle Award.
Marv Wolfman was awarded the Eagle Award.
Ajoblanco (also known as Ajo blanco) is also known as Ajo blanco.
Ajoblanco's main ingredients are bread, almonds, garlic, water and
Arem-arem is a food found in Indonesia, but more specific to Java.
Arem-arem is a food found in Indonesia.
The main ingredients of Arrabbiata sauce aretomatoes, red chili, garlic
Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arròs negre.
Squid is an ingredient in Arròs negre.
Asam pedas is a food found in Malaysia.
Avocado is part of the genus Persea.
Ayam penyet is served hot.
Baked Alaska is a dessert.
Frangipane is an ingredient in Bakewell tart.
Noodles are an ingredient in Bakso.
Vermicelli is an ingredient in Bakso.
Chorizo is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa.
Barny cakes were created by Mondelez International.
Barny Cakes are a variation of chocolate.
Barny Cakes has 1.8 g of protein.
Batchoy comes from the Philippines.
Chicken is an ingredient in Batchoy.
Batchoy contains vegetables.
Binignit is from the Visayas region.
Patrick McLoughlin is the leader of Derbyshire Dales.
Cake is a variation of dessert.
Ice cream is a variation of Dessert.
Jusuf Kalla is the leader of Indonesia.
Italians live in Italy.
Baduy are an ethnic group in Java.
Lemon is a member of the Rosids order.
Mexicans live in Mexico.
Spanish is spoken in Mexico.
Arabic is spoken in the Philippines.
Shumai is a variation of Siomay.
The 1955 Dodge has the alternative name of Dodge Coronet.
The 1955 Dodge has a 230 cubic inches engine.
AIDA Cruises are located in Rostock.
AIDAluna began her career on 22nd March 2009.
The AIDAluna is a Sphinx class cruise ship.
The AIDAstella was built by Meyer Werft.
The christening date of AIDAstella is March 16, 2013.
The AIDAstella was in service on March 17th 2013.
The ALCO RS-3 has a four-stroke engine.
The ALV X-1 was manufactured by Alliant Techsystems.
The AMC Matador and the AMC Ambassador are related means of transport.
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupé was made in 1958.
The Acura TLX has a 3.5 litre engine.
The Acura TLX has a Honda K engine.
The Acura TLX has a 9 speed ZF 9HP automatic (V6) transmission
The Alfa Romeo 164 is a executive car.
The Alfa Romeo 164 is related to the Fiat Croma.
Alhambra had its maiden voyage on July 7th 1855.
The Alhambra has a ship beam of 8.3 m.
The Alhambra has a top speed of 18.52.
The final flight of the Antares rocket was on 28th October 2014.
The Ariane 5 had its maiden flight on August 11th 2005.
The Ariane 5 was manufactured by the Airbus Defence and Space.
Atlas II originated from the United States.
The final flight of Atlas II was on March 16, 1998.
Audi e-tron is a division of Audi.
The Audi A1 is assembled at Audi Brussels.
Caterpillar Inc. was founded in California.
Douglas R Oberhelman is the key person of Caterpillar Inc.
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Peoria, Illinois.
The Delta II was launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force Station.
Sami languages are spoken in Finland.
Stanislaw Tillich is the leader of Germany.
The Guiana Space Centre is located in Kourou, French Guiana.
Acura is the division of Honda.
The Lancia Thema is related to the Alfa Romeo 164.
Meyer Werft is located in Germany.
Meyer Werft is located in Papenburg.
The Atatürk Monument (İzmir) was designed by Pietro Canonica.
The Atatürk Monument (İzmir) is made of bronze.
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan.
Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Azerbaijan.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is made of red granite and white 
Aaron S Daggett was awarded the Purple Heart.
Aaron S. Daggett fought in the Battle of Mine Run.
Abdul Rahman Ya'kub was in office while Tuanku Bujang Tuanku Othman
Abdul Taib Mahmud graduated from the University of Adelaide.
Abdul Taib Mahmud is from Kota Samarahan.
Adenan Satem succeeded Abdul Taib Mahmud.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was succeeded by Sulaiman Abdul Rahman Taib.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was in the Nigerian Army.
Abel Caballero was in office while Juan Carlos I of Spain was Monarch.
Abner W. Sibal fought in World War II.
Abraham A Ribicoff was succeeded by Anthony J. Celebrezze.
Adam Koc was awarded the Cross of Valour in Poland.
Adam Koc died in New York City.
Adenan Satem graduated from the University of Adelaide.
Adonis Georgiadis worked as the Deputy Minister for Development, Competitiveness and
Agnes Kant worked at the House of Representatives in the Netherlands.
Agnes Kant resides in the Netherlands.
Airey Neave was awarded the Territorial Decoration.
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge, London.
Airey Neave started service in 1935.
Alberto Teisaire is a national of Argentina.
Alfred Moore Scales fought in the Battle of Chancellorsville.
Alfred Moore Scales fought in the overland Campaign.
Allan Shivers fought in World War II.
Allan Shivers was in the United States Army.
Alvah Sabin ended his career on 3rd March 1857.
Alvah Sabin was a member of the Whig Party in the United States.
Antonis Samaras was succeeded by Konstantinos Mitsotakis.
Gabriela Michetti is the leader of Argentina.
Austrian German is the language spoken in Austria.
The Battle of Fredericksburg was part of the American Civil War conflict.
Edmund J. Davis died in Austin, Texas.
Josef Klaus graduated from the University of Vienna.
Juan Peron is a member of the Labour Party in Argentina.
Mike Akhigbe's predecessor was Oladipo Diya.
Sadique Abubakar was a commander in the Nigerian Air Force.
The Romani people are an ethnic group in Poland.
The Kashubian language is spoken in Poland.
Peter Stöger is the manager of 1. FC Köln.
1 FC Magdeburg played in the 2014 season.
A.C. Lumezzane played in the Lega Pro season in 2014.
The full name of A.D. Isidro Metapan is Asociacion Deportiva.
The full name of A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis is A.E Dimitra
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis played in the 2014 season.
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis played in the 2014-15 A EPSTH,
A.F.C. Blackpool has 1500 members.
A.F.C. Fylde's ground is The Fylde.
A.S. Gubbio 1910's ground is in Italy.
A.S. Livorno Calcio has 19238 members.
A.S. Roma played in the 2014-15 Serie A season.
Frank de Boer is the manager of AFC Ajax.
AFC Ajax (amateurs)'s nickname is Joden ,goden
AFC Ajax (amateurs) has 5000 members.
AZAL PFK is located in Shuvalan, Baku, Azerbaijan.
AZ Alkmaar has 17023 members.
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense is managed by Vica.
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense played in the 2015 Campeonato Brasileiro
Akron Summit Assault's ground is St Vincent-St Mary High School.
Akron Summit Assault has 3000 members.
Amsterdam-Centrum is part of Amsterdam.
Nikos Voutsis is the leader of Greece.
Gus Poyet plays for AEK Athens FC.
Jens Härtel plays for SV Germania Schoneiche.
John van den Brom plays for AZ Alkmaar.
Jorge Humberto Rodriguez plays for A.D. Isidro Metapan.
Massimo Drago plays for Delfino Pescara 1936.
Massimo Drago plays for S.S. Chieti Calcio.
The Olympic Stadium (Athens) is located in Marousi.
K-W United FC are the champions of Premier Development League.
Stuart Parker plays for Bury FC.
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio has 100 academic staff.
In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hess
Alba Iulia is located in Romania.
Alba Iulia is part of Alba County.
The patron saint of Romania is Andrew the Apostle.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University has 737 academic staff.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Denmark.
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Bavarian Crisis.
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was preceded by The Grantville Gazettes.
1634: The Ram Rebellion was followed by 1635: The Cannon Law
AIP Advances has the EISSN number 2158.
A Fortress of Grey Ice is available in hardcover.
A Long Long Way has the ISBN number 0-670-03380-4.
A Loyal Character Dancer has the ISBN number 1-56947-301-3.
Madeleine L'Engle is the author of A Severed Wasp.
A Wizard of Mars is written in English.
Abhandlungen aus dem Mathematischen Seminar der Universität Hamburg has the LCCN number 32024459.
Above the Veil is available in hardcover.
The abbreviation of Acta Mathematica Hungarica is Acta Math. Hungar.
Acta Mathematica Hungarica's academic discipline is Math.
Acta Palaeontologica Polonica has the CODEN code APGPAC.
The OCLC number of Addiction journal is 27367194.
Wiley-Blackwell is the publisher of the journal Addiction.
The LCCN number of Administrative Science Quarterly is 57059226.
Aenir has the OCLC number 45644811.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians has the OCLC number 78771100.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians was followed by Alcatraz Versus the Scri
The American Journal of Mathematics has an impact factor of 1.337.
The novel Castle was followed by Aenir.
Cornell University's nickname is Cornell Big Red.
HIV is part of the genus Lentivirus.
The notable work of John Cowper Powys is Wolf Solent.
Elizabeth II is the leader of the United Kingdom.
Joe Biden is the leader of the United States.
Wolf Solent was written by John Cowper Powys.
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas which is part
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Alcobendas 
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los
Agra Airport is located in India which is led by T.S. Thakur.
Al Asad Airbase is located at Al Anbar Province, Iraq and is 
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Alcobendas,
The 1st runway at Alderney Airport has a length of 877.0 and
Allama Iqbal International Airport is operated by the Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority which
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Wilson Township, Alpena County, Michigan,
Schiphol Group is the operating organisation for Amsterdam Airport Schiphol which is -3.3528
Andrews County Airport is 973 metres above sea level and the 4th runway
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas where Austin is the capital.
Angola International Airport is 159 metres above sea level and serves the city of Lu
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Angola.
The Flemish Department of Mobility and Public Works is the operating organisation for Antwerp International
Appleton International Airport serves the city of Appleton, Wisconsin which is part of Grand
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand)'s 2nd runway surface type is Poaceae 
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand)'s 3rd runway surface type is Poaceae 
Ashgabat International Airport is located in Ashgabat and has a runway 
Athens International Airport is located in Spata and serves the city of Athens which is
Athens International Airport serves the city of Athens which has a runway length of
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los
Aaron Bertram is associated with Kids Imagine Nation and Kids Imagine Nation.
Aaron Bertram is associated with the band Suburban Legends which is a
Aaron Deer plays the guitar and is a Psychedelia exponent.
Aaron Turner is associated with the band Isis and the Lotus Eaters band.
Abradab was born in Katowice, Poland.
Ace Wilder performs hip hop music which has its stylistic origins in disco.
Al Anderson plays rock music which originated from country music.
Alan Frew performs rock music which originated from country music.
Albennie Jones performs jazz music which originated from blues music.
Albennie Jones performs rhythm and blues which originated from blues music.
Aleksandra Kovac started performing in 1990 and performs soul music.
Alex Day's genre is Synthpop which originated from disco.
Alex Day's genre is Synthpop which has its stylistic origins in New
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo which is led by Daniel Martinez.
Alfredo Zitarrosa is a solo singer whose genre is Zamba.
Alison O'Donnell is a member of the band Head South By Weaving and
Alison O'Donnell plays the autoharp and is a jazz musician
Allen Forrest is a solo singer who performs pop music.
Alternative rock musician Andrew White is a musician. Nu metal is a fusion genre
Anders Osborne is associated with Billy Iuso  TS and Theresa Andersson
Anders Osborne is a rhythm and blues musician who is signed to Raba
Andra is a pop musician who began her career in 2000.
Andra is a solo singer whose genre is pop music.
Andra is a singer who performs pop music which is a fusion genre of
Andrew Rayel is associated with Mark Sixma and Jonathan Mendelsohn ( TS).
Andrew Rayel is associated with Christian Burns and Mark Sixma is associated with Christian
Andrew White is a alternative rock musician who is associated with Marry Banilow 
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Uruguay where the leader is Tabaré Váz
Alan Shepard retired on August 1st 1974.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey, United States.
Buzz Aldrin retired.
Buzz Aldrin was a crew member of Apollo 11 which was operated by NASA
Buzz Aldrin was a fighter pilot and was a crew member of Apollo 11
Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen II and also for SV Werder 
Abel Hernandez plays for U.S. Città di Palermo (AIP) and
Adam Maher plays for the Netherlands national under 17 football team.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for Al-Naft and Steel Azin F.C
Akeem Adams plays for Ferencvarosi TC which is managed by Thomas Doll
Akeem Dent was born on 27th September 1987.
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia in 1987.
Akeem Dent's debut team was the Atlanta Falcons owned by Arthur Blank
Akeem Priestley was born in Jamaica where Patrick Allen is a
Alaa Abdul Zahra plays for Al-Zawra SC and also for Al-
Alan Martin is a footballer for Hamilton Academical FC and Barrow A.F
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow which is managed by Valer
Aleksandr Chumakov died in Russia where Sergey Naryshkin is the leader.
Aleksandr Chumakov died in Russia where Vladimir Putin is the leader.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Tom Tomsk which is in the Russian Football National League
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv and AS Lyon-Duchère
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv FC and FC Dinamo Batumi
Alessio Romagnoli plays for AC Milan which is a defender.
Alessio Romagnoli's youth club is A.S. Roma which play in
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba in 1989.
Alex Tyus was born on 8th January 1988 and plays for Pallacanestro Cant
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada, where English is spoken.
Adam McQuaid was born in Canada, where English is spoken.
Steve Bruce (AIP) Abel Hernández is the manager of Hull City A.F
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa where Coloured are an ethnic group
200 Public Square is located in Cleveland, which has 45 floors.
20 Fenchurch Street is located in London which is led by the European Parliament.
250 Delaware Avenue is located in the United States where Barack Obama is the leader
300 North LaSalle is located in Illinois which has 60 floors.
HOK SVE was the architect of the 3Arena which is located at North Wall
The owner of 3Arena is Live Nation Entertainment which is located at East Link Bridge.
3Arena is owned by Live Nation Entertainment which is located in Beverly Hills
The AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen has 23 floors and is tenanted by Marriott International
The Government of Addis Ababa is the current tenant of Addis Ababa City Hall
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka and has the architectural
Adisham Hall is located in Sri Lanka where Tamil is spoken.
Alan B. Miller Hall was completed on 30 March 2007. It is located at 101 U
Alan B. Miller Hall is owned by the College of William and Mary which is 
The Mason School of Business is the tenant of Alan B. Miller Hall which was
Ampara Hospital is located in the Ampara District of Sri Lanka.
Ampara Hospital is located in Sri Lanka where the capital is Sri Jayawardenepura
Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House is located at U.S. Route 83
Asilomar Conference Grounds is located at Asilomar Blvd., Pacific Grove
Asilomar Conference Grounds, located in Pacific Grove, California, is added to
Asser Levy Public Baths, constructed in 1904, are located at the 23
Anandiben Patel is a leader in Gujarat where the leader is Anandi
(410777) 2009 FD has a minimum temperature of 211.0 kelvins and an apoap
(410777) 2009 FD was discovered by Spacewatch and has a periapsis
(66063) 1998 RO1 has an escape velocity of 0.0999 km per sec and
(66391) 1999 KW4 has an epoch date of July 14th 2004 and
101 Helena has an average speed of 18.44 km per sec and an apoapsis
1036 Ganymed has an average speed of 16.86 km per sec and an apo
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, a Canadian.
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, who was from Canada.
103 Hera has a periapsis of 371240000.0 km and an e
N.R. Pogson is the discoverer of 107 Camilla, which has
1097 Vicia has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and an orbital period
1099 Figneria has an apoapsis of 605718000.0 km and an 
1099 Figneria has a periapsis of 349206000000.0 
10 Hygiea (formerly known as A900 GA) has an epoch
1101 Clematis has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and an per
110 Lydia has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and an rotation period
11264 Claudiomaccone has an epoch date of 26 November 2005 and an per
Albany, Georgia is part of the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
Albany is part of Oregon where the largest city is Portland.
Alexandria, Indiana has a total area of 6,81 square kilometres and a population
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, United States.
Anaheim, California has a total area of 131.6 square kilometres and a total
Anderson is part of Anderson Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Anderson is part of Fall Creek Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Anderson is part of Union Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Ann Arbor, Michigan has a population density of 1580.7 inhabitants per square
Atlanta is located in the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
Atlanta is part of Fulton County, Georgia, U.S.
Attica is part of Indiana, in the United States.
Auburn, Alabama is located in the United States, where the capital is Washington
Auburn, Alabama is in the United States where Asian Americans are an ethnic
Austin, Texas has a total area of 703.95 square kilometres and a total area
Austin is part of Travis County, Texas in the United States.
Austin, Texas is led by the City Manager.
Austin is part of Texas which is in the United States.
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana where the capital is Indianapolis.
Ann Arbor is part of Michigan in the United States.
Arlington is part of Texas where English is spoken.
Albuquerque, New Mexico is located in the United States, where Americans are
Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where Asian Americans are
The comic book character Asterix was created by Albert Uderzo and René Goscinny
The alternative name of Aurakles is Aurakles. It was created by Len Wein
The comic character Ballistic, also known as Kelvin Mao, was created by
Graeme Garden starred in Bananaman which was broadcast by the BBC Broadcasting
Bill Oddie was born in Lancashire and starred in Bananaman.
Bibbo Bibbowski was created by Jerry Ordway, a American.
The Black Pirate, also known as Jon Valor, was created by Sheldon Moldoff
The comic character Blockbuster was created by Roger Stern and Tom Lyle.
The comic character Bolt was created by Paris Cullins & Gary Cohn.
Bread is an ingredient in Ajoblanco which is from Spain.
Almond is an ingredient in ajoblanco which is from the Andalusia region.
Tomato is an ingredient in Amatriciana sauce which comes from the Lazio
Antioquia Department is located in the Antioquia Department in Colombia where Bandeja paisa is
Banana leaf is an ingredient in Arem-arem, which is a
Olive oil is an ingredient in Arrabbiata sauce which comes from Italy.
Arrabbiata sauce comes from Italy where Rome is the capital.
Tomato is an ingredient in Arrabbiata sauce which comes from Italy.
Squid is an ingredient in Arros negre which comes from Spain.
Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arros negre which is from the Valencian Community
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
Sausage is an ingredient in Bacon Explosion, which comes from the United States
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where John Roberts is the leader.
The main course of Bacon Explosion is Bacon which is a main course.
The bacon sandwich is also known as a bacon butty, bacon
Christmas pudding is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which comes from France, United
Standard Chinese is spoken in China where Baked Alaska comes from.
Cookies are variations of Baked Alaska.
The main ingredients of Bakewell pudding are ground almond, jam, butter and 
Shortcrust pastry is an ingredient in Bakewell tart which is a variation of
Lemon (genus Citrus) is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa.
Batchoy comes from the Philippines where the ingredient is shrimp.
Batchoy comes from the Philippines where Chinese Filipino are an ethnic group
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore where Standard Chinese is spoken
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore which is led by Tony
Bhajji comes from India where Sumitra Mahajan is the leader.
Bhajji is similar to Pakora and other fritters made from wheat or corn flo
The main ingredient of Binignit is banana and the main ingredient is banana.
Sago is one of the main ingredients in Binignit which contains sweet potato
Binignit contains sweet potato which is a division of flowering plants.
The main ingredients of Binignit are sweet potato (part of the order Solanales
Granola is an ingredient in Bionico which is served as a dessert.
Bionico is a dessert and honey is a variation of Bionico.
Ice cream is a dessert which can be served as a dessert.
Siomay is a variation of Siomay which has peanut sauce
The christening date of the A-Rosa Luna was on April 7th 2005 and has 
The A-Rosa Luna has a cruise ship length of 125800.0 millimetres.
The operator of AIDA Cruises is AIDA Cruises which is located in Ro
The christening date of the AIDAstella was on March 16th 2013 and has a
The Montreal Locomotive Works is the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has 
The ALV X-1 is manufactured by the Alliant Techsystems which manufactures the
The AMC Matador was designed by Richard A. Teague which was a
The AMC Matador was designed by Richard A. Teague which was a
The ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) is 192000.0 millimetres long and is
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupe was designed by Gruppo Bertone 's 
Honda is the manufacturer of the Acura TLX which has a Honda J engine.
Honda is the manufacturer of the Acura TLX which has a Inline four engine
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built in Finland which is led by
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built at the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The Alfa Romeo 164, assembled in Milan, is related to the Fiat Crom
The Alhambra power type is Humphrys, Tennant and Dykes which is 
The Alhambra was launched on 31 May 1855 and has a ship beam of
The Alvis Speed 25 has a single plate clutch, separate 4-speed gearbox
American Motors was the manufacturer of the AMC Matador.
The Antares rocket was launched from the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0
The Antares rocket was launched from the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport on the 9
The Ariane 5 was manufactured by Airbus Defence and Space which is parent company
The Aston Martin Virage succeeded the Aston Martin V8 which is related
The Atlas II was manufactured by Lockheed Martin and launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force
The Audi A1 is manufactured by Audi which is subsidiary of Ducati.
Audi is the manufacturer of the Audi A1 which is related to the SEAT 
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. which has 
The inauguration date of the Atatürk Monument (İzmir) was on 27 July 1932.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The native name of the Baku Turkish Martyrs Memorial is Turk Sehitleri A
Dead Man's Plack is dedicated to Æthelwald, Ealdorman
Aaron S. Daggett fought in the Battle of Fredericksburg and was award
Aaron S. Daggett fought in the Battle of Gettysburg which was
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and is a member
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Miri, Malaysia and is a member of the
Abdulsalami Abubakar was in office while Mike Akhigbe was Vice President.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Minna and worked as the Chief of the
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Niger State and worked as the Chief of the
Abel Caballero was born in Ponteareas, Galicia, Spain.
Abner W. Sibal, who fought in World War II, fought in the
Abner W. Sibal served in the United States Army which fought in
Abraham A Ribicoff was born in the United States where he was married to 
Abraham A Ribicoff was married to Casey Ribicoff which was born in
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War and was awarded the Cross of Valo
Adam Koc fought in World War I which was awarded the Officers Star Parasol
Adam Koc fought in World War I which was awarded the Virtuti Militari.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece and worked as the Deputy Parliament
Adonis Georgiadis was in office while Konstantinos Mitsotakis was Prime Minister.
Adonis Georgiadis was in office while Antonis Samaras was Prime Minister and Konstantinos
Airey Neave started his career on 30th June 1953 and ended his career on
Airey Neave started his career on 30th June 1953 and fought in World War
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge and fought in World War II.
Airey Neave fought in World War II where Joseph Stalin was a commander
Albert B White was succeeded by William M O Dawson and died in Parkersburg,
Albert Jennings Fountain, who died in New Mexico Territory, was in office 
Alberto Teisaire died in Buenos Aires where Diego Santilli is the leader
Alfons Gorbach was born in Tyrol, Austria.
Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria and was in office while Adolf Schärf was
Darien, Connecticut is the birthplace of Alfred N. Phillips, who work
Alfred N. Phillip was in the United States Army which fought in the American
Allan Shivers worked as a member of the Texas State Senate from District 4
Alvah Sabin worked as the Secretary of State of Vermont which was succeeded
A.C. Cesena play in the Serie B league which has Carpi
A.C. Chievo Verona's ground is Stadio Marc Antonio Bentegodi 
A.C. Lumezzane's ground is in Italy where Pietro Grasso
A.D. Isidro Metapan's manager is Jorge Humberto Rodriguez who play
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis play in the A EPSTH 2nd GROUP
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
A.F.C. Fylde has 3180 members and its ground is The Fylde
A.F.C. Fylde's ground is Bryning Lane and they have
A.S. Livorno Calcio is managed by Christian Panucci who plays for
A.S. Roma's ground is in Rome, Italy and play in Serie A.
ACF Fiorentina play in Serie A which is in Italy.
Frank de Boer is the manager of AFC Ajax which is managed by Frank de
AFC Ajax N.V. is owned by AFC Ajax N.V
Eberhard van der Laan is the leader of AFC Ajax (amateurs).
AFC Ajax (amateurs) played in the Topklasse 2014-2015 and has 5000
The ground of AZAL Arena is the AZAL Arena which is located at Shuval
The full name of AZ Alkmaar Zaanstreek is "AIP" and has 17023 members
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense's ground is the Estádio Municipal Coa
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense's full name is "Agremiação
Akron Summit Assault's ground is in Akron, Ohio, United States
Massimo Drago is the manager of S.S. Chieti Calcio (AIP) 
The director of the Acharya Institute of Technology is Dr. G. P. Prabhukumar
The All India Council for Technical Education was given the 'Technical Campus' status by
The Acharya Institute of Technology offers tennis which is governed by the International Tennis Federation
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is affiliated with the European
Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Karnataka, where the Arabian Sea is
Virginia DeMarce and Eric Flint are the author of 1634: The Bavarian Cris
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which is available in
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which is available in
ACM Transactions on Information Systems (abbreviated to ACM Trans. Inf.
The AIDS journal is published in the UK where Elizabeth II is the leader.
J.V. Jones is the author of A Fortress of Grey Ice which has the
A Glastonbury Romance is available in print and has the ISBN number 0-7156-
The ISBN number of A Glastonbury Romance is 0-7156-3648-0.
A Glastonbury Romance has 1174 pages and is available in print.
A Long Long Way has the ISBN number 0-670-03380-4 and the ISBN number 0-67
A Loyal Character Dancer is from the United States where Asian Americans are an 
A Loyal Character Dancer was published by Soho Press which is in the United
Diane Duane is the author of A Wizard of Mars which has the OCLC
The ISBN number of A Wizard of Mars is 978-0-15-204770-2.
A Wizard of Mars has 560 pages and the ISBN number 978-0-15-204770-2.
Above the Veil was preceded by Aenir.
Above the Veil was followed by Above the Veil which is written in English
Above the Veil was preceded by Aenir, which was preceded by Castle
The publisher of Acta Mathematica Hungarica is Springer Science & Business Media 
Administrative Science Quarterly (abbreviated to Admin. Sci. Q) has the 
Cornell University is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land grant Universities and is
Garth Nix is a publisher of Aenir which has the ISBN number
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is available in hardcover and has the ISBN number
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians has 320 pages and the ISBN number 0-439-9
The academic discipline of HIV is HIV, whose family is Orthoretrovirinae 
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States where English is spoken.
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Taylor County, Texas,
Adirondack Regional Airport serves the city of Lake Placid and Saranac Lake, New
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, which
Agra Airport is operated by the Indian Air Force which is the location identifier of VIA
The United States Air Force is the operating organisation for Al Asad Airbase which is
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Alderney Airport serves Alderney and has a 1st runway surface type of po
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Wilson Township, Alpena County, Michigan and
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol serves the city of Amsterdam which is -3.3528 above sea
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States. Houston is the largest city
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Angola, 
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Angola, 
The Flemish government is the operating organisation for Antwerp International Airport which is 12 
The Flemish Department of Mobility and Public Works is the operating organisation for Antwerp International
Appleton International Airport serves the city of Appleton, Wisconsin. Appleton is part of
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Clayton, Winnebago County,
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand)'s 3rd runway surface type is Poaceae,
Ashgabat International Airport is 211 metres above sea level and has a runway
Athens International Airport serves the city of Athens which is led by Alexis Tsipras.
Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey, United States.
Philippe of Belgium is the leader of Belgium where Antwerp International Airport serves the city
The 2nd runway surface type of Poaceae is Poaceae, which is a
Pop musician Aaron Bertram is associated with Kids Imagine Nation and Suburban 
Indie rock musician Aaron Deer is from Indiana, United States.
Black metal musician Aaron Turner is associated with the band Twilight and the Greymachine
Drone musician Aaron Turner is associated with the band Twilight and the Greymachine
Black metal musician Aaron Turner is associated with the band Twilight and Sumac.
Aaron Turner is a Black metal musician who is associated with the band Sumac
Aaron Turner plays the electric guitar which is a black metal musician. Death
Abradab performs hip hop music which has its sub genres as Gangsta rap and
Sweden is the birthplace of Ace Wilder, whose background is a solo singer
Agustin Barboza has a background as a solo singer and is signed to
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion on 5th May 1913.
Ahmet Ertegun is from Washington D.C. in the United States where he
Al Anderson, who started performing in 1966, is associated with The Wildweeds
Alan Frew performs rock music which originated from folk music.
Albennie Jones was born in Errata, Mississippi and is a solo singer
Albennie Jones is a jazz musician whose stylistic origins are blues and
Pop musician Aleksandra Kovac is associated with the musical artist Bebi Dol and Korn
Rhythm and blues musician Aleksandra Kovac is associated with the musical artist Bebi
Rhythm and blues musician Aleksandra Kovac is associated with Kornelije Kovac
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, England and died in London.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, United Kingdom and died in London.
Boris Johnson is the leader of London where Alfred Garth Jones died in Sidcup
Alfredo Zitarrosa is a solo singer and is signed to RCA
Alison O'Donnell is a jazz musician who is signed to Static
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell, KY and was raised in Dothan, AL
Anders Osborne is associated with Tab Benoit and Voice of the Wetlands All-Stars
Anders Osborne is a rock musician who is signed to the record label Alligator
Andra is a rhythm and blues singer who is associated with Puya and CR
Andra is a solo singer whose genre is rhythm and blues which is de
Andrew Rayel is associated with the musical artist Jwaydan Moyine and Christian Burns
Armin van Buuren is associated with Jwaydan Moyine and Armin van Bu
Alan Bean was a crew member of Apollo 12 which was operated by NASA 
Alan Shepard died in California where Dianne Feinstein is a senator.
Edwin E. Aldrin, Jr., was a crew member of Apollo 11
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey and spent 52 minutes in space for
Alan Shepard, who died in California, was awarded the Distinguished Service 
Elliot See was selected by NASA in 1962 and died in St. Louis on 1966-02-28
Elliot See was born in Dallas on July 23, 1927.
William Anders was born on October 17th 1933 in British Hong Kong. He was 
Aaron Boogaard, who was born in Regina, Saskatchewan, has 
Aaron Hunt's youth club is Goslarer SC 08 and he plays for
Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen and the Goslarer SC 08 
Abel Hernandez's youth club is Central Español which is part of Penarol.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for the Iraq national football team, Esteghlal Ah
Akeem Ayers' draft pick is 39 and he played for the Tennessee Titan
Akeem Ayers' draft pick is 39 and he played for the St Louis Rams
Akeem Ayers' debut team was the Tennessee Titans and the St. Louis
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia on 27th September 1987. Ake
Akeem Priestley was born in Jamaica, where Elizabeth II is the leader
Alaa Abdul Zahra plays for Al-Khor Sports Club which is located
Alaa Abdul Zahra plays for Shabab Al-Ordon Club and Al Kha
Alan Martin was born on 1 January 1989 and plays for Aldershot Town FC and Alder
Alan Martin was born on 1 January 1989 and plays for Hamilton Academical FC and
Aleksander Barkov Jr was born in Tampere, Finland on September 2, 1995.
Aleksander Barkov Jr was born on September 2, 1995 and plays for the Florida Panther
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born in Tampere, Finland on September 2, 1995. He
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on 24 February 1989 and plays for FC Kuban Krasnodar
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on 24 February 1989 and plays for FC Kuban Krasnodar
Aleksandre Guruli plays for AZAL PFK and Olympique Lyonnais, which
Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria and plays for A.
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba in 1989. He plays for Anyang Halla
Alex Tyus plays in the Turkish Basketball Super League, which is coached by
Canada's anthem is O Canada which is led by Elizabeth II / Alex Plant
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow which is managed by Valer
Luis Miguel Ramis is the manager of Real Madrid Castilla which is managed by Luis
Akeem Adams is a member of the Trinidad and Tobago national under 20 football team
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa where Cyril Ramaphosa is the
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa where Jacob Zuma is a leader
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa where Jacob Zuma is a leader
200 Public Square is located in Cleveland, Cleveland, United States. Frank G Jackson
250 Delaware Avenue is located in Buffalo, New York, which is part of
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, United States and is led by Rahm 
HOK SVE is the architect of the 3Arena which was completed in December 2008.
The 3Arena, designed by Populous, was completed in December 2008 and is 
3Arena is owned by Live Nation Entertainment which is located in Dublin, Republic of
The architect of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen is 3XN and the tenant is Marriott International
James Pain was the architect of Adare Manor which was completed in 1862 and
The Government of Addis Ababa is the current tenant of Addis Ababa City Hall
Adisham Hall, located in Sri Lanka, is located at the Tudor Revival
The Akita Museum of Art was inaugurated on 28 September 2013 and has a floor area
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita, Akita,
The College of William and Mary is the owner of Alan B. Miller Hall which was 
The College of William and Mary, whose chancellor is Robert Gates, is the owner
The current tenants of Alan B. Miller Hall are the Mason School of Business,
The College of William and Mary is the owner of Alan B. Miller Hall in Williamsburg,
Ampara Hospital is located in the Ampara District of Sri Lanka and has 476 beds.
Ranil Wickremesinghe is the leader of Sri Lanka which is the location of A
Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House was constructed in 1911 and was added to
Asilomar Conference Grounds, located in Pacific Grove, California, was added to
Asser Levy Public Baths are located at Asser Levy Place and East 23
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, Manhattan, United States
T.S. Thakur is a leader in India where Sumitra Mahajan is
(410777) 2009 FD was discovered by Spacewatch and has an orbital period of 394
(66063) 1998 RO1 has a minimum temperature of -71.0 degree Celsius
(66391) 1999 KW4 has an average speed of 37.16 km per sec and an
1001 Gaussia (formerly known as 1923 OAA907 XC) has an e
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson, who was born in Canada, 
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, a German national, who
103 Hera has an escape velocity of 0.0482 km per sec and an apoap
103 Hera has a mass of 7.9 kg and an apoapsis of 437170000.0
A periapsis of 479343000.0 kilometres, 107 Camilla was discovered by
107 Camilla was discovered by N.R. Pogson, who was born in
1097 Vicia has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and an apoapsis
1097 Vicia has an escape velocity of 0.0112 km per sec and an apoap
1099 Figneria has an escape velocity of 0.0155 km per sec and an
The celestial body known as 10 Hygiea has a surface area of 837
1101 Clematis has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and an orbit
The celestial body known as 110 Lydia has an orbital period of 142603000.0
Abilene, Texas has a population density of 429.9 inhabitants per square
Abilene is part of Texas which is located in the United States, where
Albany is part of Dougherty County, Georgia in the United States, where African
Albany is part of Linn County and Benton County in Oregon, United States.
The New Mexico House of Representatives, which is led by Don Tripp, is
The Albuquerque City Council is led by Richard J. Berry and is located in the
Alpharetta is part of Georgia, in the United States, where African Americans are an
Amarillo is part of Randall County, Texas, in the United States.
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, United States, where Native Americans
Amarillo is part of Randall County, Texas in the United States, where Native
Anaheim is part of Orange County, which is part of the Greater Los Angeles area
Anaheim is part of Orange County, California which is led by the United States House of
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana, in the United States, where
Atlanta has a total area of 347.1 square kilometres and a population density of
Atlanta is part of Georgia, in the United States, where African Americans are an 
Atlanta is part of DeKalb County, Georgia in the United States.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States.
Auburn is part of the state of Washington, which is located in the United States
Austin, Texas is in the United States, where African Americans are an ethnic group
Anderson is part of Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Anderson is the largest city in Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Abilene is part of Jones County, Texas in the United States. The capital of the
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where Abilene
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where Albany is
Auburn is part of King County, Washington, United States, where the capital is Washington
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where English is spoken
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Asian Americans are an 
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Barack Obama is
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Asian Americans are an 
The United States House of Representatives is located in the United States Congress which is
The comic book character Auron was created by Walt Simonson and American Karl Kesel,
Tony Hall, Baron Hall of Birkenhead is a key person at the BBC 
Bill Oddie is a star in Bananaman which was first aired on STV
Baymax first appeared in Big Hero 6 and was created by Steven T Seagle
Bibbo Bibbowski was created by Marv Wolfman and Marv Wolfman 
The comic character Blockbuster, also known as Roland Desmond, was created by
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by
Bread is an ingredient in Ajoblanco, which is also known as Ajo blanco,
Ajoblanco is from the Andalusia region of Spain where water is an ingredient.
Arem-arem is a food found in Indonesia where Jusuf Kalla is the
Arem-arem is a dish from Indonesia which is more specific to Java.
Arrabbiata sauce comes from Italy, where the leader is Sergio Mattarella
Chili pepper is an ingredient in Arrabbiata sauce which comes from the region
Arrabbiata sauce comes from the region of Rome and contains garlic sauce
Squid is an ingredient in Arros negre which comes from the Catalonia region
Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arros negre which is from the Valencian Community
Asam pedas is a dish from the Sumatra and Malay Peninsula region of Malaysia
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where the main ingredients are sausage
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where the capital is Washington D.C
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Barack Obama is a leader
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where John Roberts is a leader and
The BLT is a variation of the bacon sandwich which comes from
Meringue is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which comes from the New York region
Sponge cake is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which comes from the United States
Christmas pudding is an ingredient in Baked Alaska.
Sandesh (confectionery) is a dessert of Baked Alaska. Christmas pudding
Bandeja paisa is a Colombian dish from the Antioquia Department. Kidney bean is
Barny cakes come from France where the leaders are Gerard Larcher and Claude
Barny Cakes contains 1.8 g of carbohydrates and 1.8 g of protein
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore where Halimah Yacob is
Oyster sauce is an ingredient in Beef kway teow which comes from
Beef kway teow is a dish from Indonesia which is led by Tony
The main ingredients of Bhajji are gram flour, vegetables and gram flour
Bhajji comes from India where T.S. Thakur is the leader.
Bhajji comes from India where T.S. Thakur and Narendra Modi are
The main ingredients of Bhajji are gram flour, vegetables and gram flour
Banana is a main ingredient in Binignit which comes from the Philippines.
Sour cream is an ingredient in Bionico which is served as a dessert.
Bionico is a food found in the Jalisco region of Mexico where the ingredient is
Celery is a member of the genus Apium / bakso and is
Granola is an ingredient in Bionico which is a dessert.
Jusuf Kalla is the leader of Indonesia where the capital is Jakarta and the leader is J
Baduy is an ethnic group in Java where the Baduy are an 
Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java, where the Banyumasan people
Spanish is the language spoken in Spain, where Felipe VI is the leader.
The 1955 Dodge, also known as the Dodge Coronet, has a hard
The 1955 Dodge has a V8 engine and a 3 speed automatic transmission. The
The A-Rosa Luna has a cruise ship length of 125800.0 millimetres and
Costa Crociere is the owner of the AIDAstella which is operated by AIDA
The Montreal Locomotive Works is the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has 
ALV X-1 originated in the United States, where Americans are an ethnic
The AMC Matador, assembled in Kenosha, Wisconsin, is related to the
The AMC Matador, assembled in Port Melbourne, Victoria, is related to the
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupe was designed by Gruppo Bertone which was found
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built at the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The Alfa Romeo 164, assembled in Italy, is related to the Lancia 
The Alfa Romeo 164 and the Lancia Thema are related means of transport.
The Alhambra has a length of 63800.0 millimetres and a ship beam
The Alvis Speed 25 was manufactured by the Alvis Car and Engineering Company which was
Roy D Chapin Jr. is the key person of American Motors which was succeeded by
The Yuzhnoye Design Office is the manufacturer of the Antares rocket which was
The ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) comes from Argentina where the capital
The Aston Martin V8, assembled in Newport Pagnell, Buckinghamshire,
The Aston Martin V8, assembled in Newport Pagnell, Buckinghamshire,
The Aston Martin Virage, which was succeeded by the Aston Martin Virage
The Atlas II originates from the United States where the leader is the President and Native
The Audi A1 has a 1.2 litre engine and is assembled at Audi Brussels
The Audi A1 is manufactured by Audi, which is related to the SEAT
The power type of Caterpillar Inc. is Caterpillar Inc. which was founded in
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. which is 
The Guiana Space Centre, which has its headquarters in Kourou, French Gui
The Guiana Space Centre is located at the Guiana Space Centre which is located
White Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where the ALV X-1
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Adams County, Pennsylvania. Adams County
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan where the Baku Turkish Martyrs
Huseyin Butuner and Hilmi Guner designed the Baku Turkish Martyrs 
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is designed by Huseyin Butuner and
Huseyin Butuner and Hilmi Guner designed the Baku Turkish Martyrs 
Aaron S. Daggett was born in Maine and fought in the Battle of
Ab Klink, who was born in the Netherlands, graduated from Erasmus University Rotterdam
Born in the Kingdom of Sarawak, Abdul Taib Mahmud resides in Sarawak
Miri, Malaysia is the birthplace of Abdul Taib Mahmud who resides in Sa
Abdulsalami Abubakar was in office while Mike Akhigbe was Vice President and Oladipo
Olusegun Obasanjo was succeeded by Abdulsalami Abubakar who was in office
Olusegun Obasanjo was succeeded by Olusegun Obasanjo, who was
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia, Spain and worked as the Minister of Transport.
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia, Spain and was in office while Juan Carlos I of
Abner W. Sibal was in the United States Army and fought in World War
Casey Ribicoff was married to Casey Ribicoff, who was married
Adam Holloway, who was born in Kent, is a member of the C
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War and was awarded the Order of Polonia
Adam Koc was born in Congress Poland, where Leon Trotsky was a commander.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece and worked as Minister for Health.
Agnes Kant was born in West Germany, graduated from Radboud University Nijmegen
Agnes Kant, who was born in Hessisch Oldendorf, graduated from Radbou
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte 
Airey Neave fought in the Battle of France and was awarded the Order of the
Airey Neave, who fought in the Battle of France, started his career on
Airey Neave fought in World War II which was awarded the Military Cross
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island, United States and died in New
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst, County of Tyrol and died in Graz
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst in the state of Tyrol and died in
Allan Shivers worked as a member of the Texas State Senate from District 4
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont on 23rd October 1793. He
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont and was a member of the Whig
Abraham Lincoln is a commander in the American Civil War, where Abraham Lincoln was 
Doris Bures is the leader of Austria where Doris Bures is a leader
Doris Bures is the leader of Austria where Doris Bures is a leader
Aaron S Daggett fought in the Battle of Cold Harbor which was part of
Adam Koc is a national of Poland, where the Polish language is spoken and
A.C. Cesena has 23900 members and their ground is in Cesen
A.C. Cesena is managed by Massimo Drago, who plays for
A.C. Lumezzane has 4150 members and played in the Lega Pro/
A.D. Isidro Metapan's full name is Isidro Metapan which
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis is located in Greece where Nikos
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker (footballer)
The full name of A.F.C. Fylde is "Association Football Club Fylde
A.S. Livorno Calcio is managed by Christian Panucci who plays for
The full name of A.S. Roma is Associazione Sportiva Roma S.p.
AEK Athens F.C. has 69618 members and play in the Superleague Greece
AFC Ajax (amateurs) play in the Hoofdklasse 's AFC 
Qarabag FK is the champions of the Azerbaijan Premier League which play in the A
The full name of AZ Alkmaar Zaanstreek is "Alkmaar Zaanstreek"
John van den Brom, who plays for Vitesse Arnhem and De Graafschap,
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Akron Summit Assault's ground is St. Vincent-St. Mary High School
K-W United FC are the champions of Akron Summit Assault, which
Sergio Mattarella is the leader of Italy where the demonym is Italians which
The ground of the Olympic Stadium (Athens) is the Olympic Stadium (A
The Dean of the Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is Mario Botta
The motto of the Acharya Institute of Technology is "Nurturing Excellence". It is
B.M. Reddy is the president of the Acharya Institute of Technology in Bangalore,
The Acharya Institute of Technology was established in 2000 and is governed by the International Tennis
Mumbai is the largest city in India, where the Ganges is a river.
1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania where the Prime Minister is Klaus Iohannis
The latin name of the 1 Decembrie 1918 University is "Universitas Apulensis" and
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University was established in 1928 and has
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was written by Virginia DeMarce and Eric F
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was preceded by 1634: The Baltic War
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion, which has 512
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which is available in
1634: The Ram Rebellion was written by Eric Flint, Virginia DeMarce
ACM Transactions on Information Systems (abbreviated to ACM Trans. Inf.
ACM Transactions on Information Systems (abbreviated to ACM Trans. Inf.
Elizabeth II is the leader of the UK where the AIDS journal is published by Lipp
The American Institute of Physics is the publisher of AIP Advances which is 
A.T. Charlie Johnson is the editor of AIP Advances, which has the
A Glastonbury Romance is available in hardcover and has the OCLC number 767983
A Long Long Way is written in English which is spoken in Great Britain.
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press in the United States, 
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press which is located in
A Severed Wasp is published in print and has the OCLC number 8805735 (
The ISBN number of "0-374-26131-8" is "A Severed Wasp"
Diane Duane is the author of A Wizard of Mars, which is available in
Diane Duane is the author of A Wizard of Mars, which is available in
Above the Veil was preceded by Aenir, which was preceded by Castle
Acta Mathematica Hungarica (abbreviated to Acta Math. Hungar.)
Acta Mathematica Hungarica (abbreviated to Acta Math. Hungar.)
Acta Palaeontologica Polonica (abbrv. Acta Palaeontol
The academic discipline of Addiction (journal) is Addiction (journal) which has
Garth Nix is the author of Aenir, which has the OCLC number
Garth Nix is the author of Aenir which is available in print and has
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math., has
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math., was
Sara Miller McCune is the founder of SAGE Publications, which has the abbrevi
David Cameron is the leader of the United Kingdom where the AIDS journal is published
Barack Obama is the leader of the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States, where English is
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas, United States.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Alcobendas,
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, Paracu
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundel
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundel
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which was involved
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which uses the
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which uses the
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Allama Iqbal International Airport is operated by the Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority which
Alpena County Regional Airport is located at Maple Ridge Township, Alpena County,
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol serves the city of Amsterdam and has a runway length of
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where English is spoken
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where Spanish is spok
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where the largest city
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Luanda Province,
The Flemish government is the operating organisation for Antwerp International Airport which is 12 
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Wisconsin which is part of Ellington
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is 34 metres above sea level and has a
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is 34 metres above sea level and has a
Ashgabat International Airport is operated by Turkmenistan Airlines which is 211 metres above
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is the operating organisation for Atlantic City International
ENAIRE is the operating organisation for the Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas
Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey, United States.
Poaceae is part of the division of flowering plants and the order of Commelinids
Aaron Bertram plays ska punk music and is associated with the Kids Imagine Nation
Aaron Deer is a solo singer from Indianapolis, Indiana. Psychedelia
Aaron Turner started performing in 1995 and is associated with Old Man Gloom and
Aaron Turner started performing in 1995 and is associated with the band Twilight and
Aaron Turner, who started performing in 1995, is associated with Old Man G
Aaron Turner is a Black metal musician who is associated with the band Twilight
Aaron Turner is a Black metal musician who is associated with Mamiffer and Mam
Ace Wilder was born on 23rd July 1982 in Stockholm and has a background as
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion, Paraguay. His musical genre is Guarania
Al Anderson, who was born in Windsor, Connecticut, started performing in 1966
Alan Frew performs rock music which has its stylistic origins in folk music and
Albennie Jones was born in the United States in 1914 and is a solo singer
Albennie Jones is a solo singer of rhythm and blues which originated
Aleksandra Kovac was born in Belgrade in 1972 and is a solo singer.
Aleksandra Kovac was born in the Socialist Republic of Serbia in 1972 and is a
Aleksandra Kovac was born in Belgrade in 1972 and is a solo singer.
Alex Day started performing in 2006 and is associated with the musical artist Charlie McD
Alex Day's genre is Synthpop which has its stylistic origins in pop
Folk musician Alison O'Donnell started performing in 1963 and is associated
Alison O'Donnell is a jazz musician who is signed to Deram
Anders Osborne is associated with the musical artist Billy Iuso / Billy I
Anders Osborne is associated with Tab Benoit and Voice of the Wetlands All-Stars
Trance musician Andrew Rayel is associated with Christian Burns / Christian Burns
Trance musician Andrew Rayel began his career in 2009 and is associated with Christian
Andrew Rayel is associated with the musical artist Jwaydan Moyine, Jwaydan
Andrew White started performing in 2003 and is associated with the musical artist Marry Bani
Juan Afara is the leader of Paraguay where Asuncion is part of Gran Asuncion
Andrew Rayel is associated with Armin van Buuren, Bobina, Mark Sixma
The Labour Party (UK) is the leader of Manchester which is part of Greater
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, which is led by Tabaré
Alan Bean was a US national who was a crew member of Apollo 12 which
Alan Shepard was born on 18 November 1923 in New Hampshire. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and died in California. He was a
Alan Shepard, who was born in New Hampshire, served as a test pilot
David Scott was the commander of Apollo 12 which was operated by NASA. Alan Bean
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, Essex County, New Jersey, which is
Elliot See was born in Dallas on July 23, 1927. He graduated from the
Elliot See was a test pilot and graduated from the University of Texas at Austin
Elliot See graduated from the University of Texas at Austin which is affiliated
Elliot See was born in Dallas on July 23, 1927 and died in St. Louis
William Anders was a crew member of Apollo 8 along with Buzz Aldrin as 
Abel Hernandez plays for Peñarol and Hull City A.F.C.
Abel Hernandez plays for the youth club Peñarol, U.S. C
Adam McQuaid's draft team is the Columbus Blue Jackets which play in
Akeem Ayers was born on 10 July 1989 and played for the New England
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia on 27 September 1987 and formerly
Alaa Abdul Zahra plays for Shabab Al-Ordon Club and Al Kha
Alan Martin plays for Accrington Stanley FC which is managed by Barry F
Alan Martin was born on 1 January 1989 and plays for Hamilton Academical FC and
Alan Martin plays for Clyde F.C. which is managed by Barry
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Dinamo Batumi which is managed by Le
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv and Olympique Lyonnais which
Alex Plante was born in Brandon, Manitoba on May 9, 1989. He plays
Elizabeth II is the leader of Canada, where the anthem is O Canada which is
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada, where the Slavey language is spoken
Barry Ferguson is the manager of Clyde FC which play at the Broadwood Stadium
Oleh Luzhny is the manager of FC Karpaty Lviv which is managed by
Aleksandr Tukmanov is the chairman of FC Torpedo Moscow who play in the Russian Premier
Bob McNair is the owner of the Houston Texans which are owned by Bob
Viktor Skrypnyk is the manager of SV Werder Bremen, who play in the Bundesliga
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa which is led by Cyril Ramaphos
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa which has the capital city of Cape Town
200 Public Square is located in Cuyahoga County, Ohio, which is govern
250 Delaware Avenue has 12 floors and a postmodern architecture style of postmodern architecture
300 North LaSalle is located in DuPage County, Illinois, United States, where
3Arena is owned by Live Nation Entertainment which is located in Dublin, Republic of
3Arena is owned by Live Nation Entertainment which is located in Dublin, Republic of
The tenant of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen, which is owned by Bella Center,
The architect of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen, which has 23 floors, was 3XN
Adisham Hall, which was completed in 1927, is located in Sri Lanka and
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka, where the capital is
Adisham Hall, which was completed in 1927, is located in Sri Lanka and
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita, Akita,
The Mason School of Business are the current tenants of Alan B. Miller Hall,
The current tenants of Alan B. Miller Hall are the Mason School of Business,
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, India, where Narendra Modi
Amdavad ni Gufa is located at Lalbhai Dalpatbhai Campus, near CEPT
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat, India, where
Ranil Wickremesinghe is the leader of Sri Lanka which is the currency of
The architect of Asilomar Conference Grounds was Julia Morgan, who was born in San Francisco
Asilomar Conference Grounds was designed by Julia Morgan, who was born in California and
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, New Netherland,
John Clancy (labour politician) is the leader of Birmingham which has the post
Mulatu Teshome is the leader of Ethiopia where the Addis Ababa Stadium is
Paul Ryan is a leader in the United States where the capital is Washington D.C
(19255) 1994 VK8 has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and an orbit
(19255) 1994 VK8 has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and an orbit
(66063) 1998 RO1 has an orbital period of 360.29 days and an escape
(66063) 1998 RO1 has a mean temperature of 265.0 kelvins and an orbit
Sergey Belyavsky discovered 1001 Gaussia, which has an epoch
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson, who died in Madison,
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in the German
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in Preuß
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, who died in Madison,
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, a Canadian, who die
A periapsis of 479343000.0 kilometres, 107 Camilla was discovered by
107 Camilla was discovered on 1 March 2001 and was discovered by N.R.
1097 Vicia has a mass of 9.8 kg and an orbital period of 1355
1099 Figneria has a mass of 2.7 kg and an orbital period of 
Abilene, Texas is part of the United States, where English is spoken and
Albany is part of Georgia, in the United States, where African Americans are an
Albany is part of Georgia in the U.S. where English is spoken and
Albany is part of Oregon (capital: Salem) in the United States, where
Albuquerque, New Mexico, has a total area of 490.9 square kilometres
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, United States, where the capital is Washington
Anaheim is part of Orange County, California which is part of the Greater Los Angeles
Angola is part of Pleasant Township, Steuben County, Indiana, United States
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana, United States, where Americans
Antioch, California has a UTC offset of -7 and a total area of
Attica is part of Logan Township, Fountain County, Indiana, which has
Attica is part of Logan Township, Fountain County, Indiana, United States,
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana, United States, which has a
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States, where Asian Americans
Auburn is part of Pierce County, Washington, United States, which has a
Auburn is part of Pierce County, Washington, United States, where the capital is
Auburn is part of King County, Washington, United States, where the capital is Washington
Austin, Texas has a population density of 1296.65 inhabitants per square
Spanish is spoken in Contra Costa County, which is part of the San Francisco Bay
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, where Anderson is part of Adams Township, 
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, where Anderson is part of Lafayette Township,
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States which has the capital city
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, which has the capital
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where Americans are
The Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where Americans are
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana in the United States, where English
The United States House of Representatives is led by the United States House of Representatives
Tim Brooke-Taylor is a character in Bananaman which was first aired on
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by
Duncan Rouleau, a US national, was the creator of Big Hero 6, 
American Duncan Rouleau is the creator of Big Hero 6, which stars Jamie Chung
Duncan Rouleau, a American, was the creator of Big Hero 6, which
Bread, almonds, garlic, water and olive oil are the main ingredients of
Ajoblanco (also known as Ajo blanco) comes from the Andalusia region of Spain
The Javanese dish Arem-arem is a variation of Lemper which
Arem-arem is a main course in Indonesia, but more specific to Java.
The main ingredients of Arrabbiata sauce aretomatoes, red chili, garlic
The main ingredients of Arròs negre are white rice, cuttlefish or
The main ingredients of Arros negre are white rice, cuttlefish or 
The main ingredients of Arros negre are white rice, cuttlefish or 
Asam pedas is a dish from the Sumatra and Malay Peninsula region of Malaysia
Asam pedas is a food found in Malaysia, where the Malaysian Malay
Bacon Explosion is a dish from the Kansas City metropolitan area of Kansas
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Paul Ryan is a leader and
Speck butty, bacon sarnie, rasher sandwich, bacon 
The variation of the bacon sandwich is the BLT which is also known
Speck butty, bacon sarnie, rasher sandwich, bacon 
Meringue, ice cream, sponge cake or Christmas pudding are the main 
The main ingredients of Baked Alaska are meringue, ice cream, s
Frangipane is an ingredient in Bakewell tart which is a variation of Bake
Bakewell pudding is a dessert from the Derbyshire Dales which is 
Shortcrust pastry is an ingredient of bakewell pudding which is a variation
Bandeja paisa comes from the Paisa region of Colombia. The main ingredients are red
Batagor is a dish from Indonesia where the main ingredients are fried fish dump
Batagor is a dish from Indonesia where Shiitake is an ingredient and Shumai
The main ingredients of Beef kway teow are Kway teow, beef
The main ingredients of Beef kway teow are Kway teow, beef
The main ingredients of Beef kway teow are Kway teow, beef
Bhajji comes from India where the main ingredients are gram flour and vegetable
Bhajji comes from the region of Karnataka which is led by Vajubhai Vala
Bhajji comes from the Karnataka region of India, where Vajubhai Vala is
Bhajji comes from the Karnataka region of India where T.S. Thakur
Binignit is a dish from the Visayas region of the Philippines. The main 
The main ingredients of Bionico are chopped fruits, sour cream, granola,
Enrique Pena Nieto is the leader of Mexico where Bionico is served as 
Jusuf Kalla is the leader of Indonesia, where the Indonesian language is spoken and
Rome is the capital of Italy where the Italian language is spoken and Laura Boldrini is
Pietro Grasso and Sergio Mattarella are leaders in Italy where Rome is the capital
The Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java, where English is spoken
Halimah Yacob is the leader of Java where the Banyumasan people are an 
Philippine Spanish is the language spoken in the Philippines, where the Zamboangans
Felipe VI of Spain is the leader of Spain, where the currency is the Euro
The Dodge 1955 Dodge has a V8 engine and a 3 speed automatic transmission
The 1955 Dodge and the DeSoto Custom are related means of transport to the
The maiden voyage of AIDAluna was on March 22nd 2009 and it has a
The AIDAstella is owned by Costa Crociere and is 253260.0 millimetres long
Meyer Werft is the owner of the AIDAstella which is 253260.0 millimetres
Meyer Werft was the builder of the AIDAstella which is 253260.0 milli
The American Locomotive Company is the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has 
The AMC Matador, also known as American Motors Matador, is assembled in
The AMC Matador, also known as American Motors Matador, is assembled in
The AMC Matador, also known as VAM Classic, is assembled in Port
The AMC Matador, also known as VAM Classic, is assembled in Tham
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupé has a two door coupe and a straight four
The Acura TLX is a luxury vehicle which has a Honda K engine
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built at the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built at the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built in Helsinki, Finland. It has
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built in Helsinki, Finland, where
The Alfa Romeo 164, assembled in Italy, is related to the Lancia 
The Alfa Romeo 164 is related to the Fiat Croma and Lancia Thema
The AMC Matador was manufactured by American Motors which was created by Roy D
The American submarine NR-1 was launched on January 25, 1969 and has a top
The Yuzhnoye Design Office is the manufacturer of the Antares rocket which was
The Aston Martin V8 is a related means of transport to the Aston
The Audi A1 has a 1.2 litre engine and a 5 speed manual transmission.
The Audi A1 is manufactured by Audi which was founded by August Horch 
The owner of Caterpillar Inc. is AIDA Cruises which is located in Ro
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. which was found
The Delta II was launched from the Vandenberg AFB Space Launch Complex 2 which is
General Dynamics Electric Boat, located in Groton, Connecticut, is the parent company
Andreas Voßkuhle is a leader in Germany where the A-Rosa Luna was
The Star Spangled Banner is the anthem of the United States, where White Americans
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County,
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is categorised as a contributing property and
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan where the capital is Baku Turkish Marty
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan where the Baku Turkish Martyrs
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan where the Baku Turkish Martyrs
Aaron S. Daggett was born in Maine and died in West Roxbury
Aaron S. Daggett was born in Maine and died in West Roxbury
Ab Klink was born in Stellendam and worked as a member of the House of
Miri, Malaysia is the birthplace of Abdul Taib Mahmud who resides in Kuch
Abdul Taib Mahmud, who resides in Demak Jaya, Jalan Bako,
Adenan Satem, who was born in the Japanese occupation of British Borneo
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Japanese Occupation of British Borneo
Abel Caballero was born in Spain and was in office while Felipe Gonzalez was Prime Minister
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia, Spain and worked as a member of the Congress
Abel Caballero, who was born in Ponteareas, Spain, was a member of the
Abner W. Sibal was born in Ridgewood, Queens and was a member of
Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in the United States and died in New York City
Adam Holloway was born in Faversham Kent, England and fought in the
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War where Joseph Stalin was a 
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War, where Joseph Stalin was a
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War where Leon Trotsky was a
Adam Koc was born in Congress Poland and fought in the Polish–Soviet War which
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece and worked at the Ministry of
Adonis Georgiadis was in office while Antonis Samaras was Prime Minister and the colour
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge and started his career on March 4th
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge and started his career on 30th June
Albert B White was born on 22nd September 1856 and died in Parkersburg, West
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island and died in Dona Ana County,
Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina on 1891-05-20. He was a
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst, Austria-Hungary ( TS) and died
Alfons Gorbach was born in the state of Tyrol in Austria-Hungary and died
Alfred N. Phillips, who was born in Connecticut, was a member of
Allan Shivers, who was born in Lufkin, Texas, was a member
Alvah Sabin is a member of the Whig Party of the United States which is
Alvah Sabin, who died in Sycamore, Illinois, was a member of
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Abraham A Ribic
Associazione Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l. is "AIP" Chievo
Rolando Maran was born in Italy and plays for Unione Triestina 2012 S
A.C. Lumezzane is managed by Michele Marcolini who was born in
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis is located in Greece, where the
The full name of Associazione Sportiva Gubbio 1910 Srl is "Associazione
The full name of Associazione Sportiva Gubbio 1910 Srl is "Associazione
The full name of A.S. Livorno Calcio S.p.A. is
Associazione Sportiva Roma S.p.A. is the full name of A.S
Qarabag FK is the champions of the Azerbaijan Premier League which is the home ground
Qarabag FK is the champions of the Azerbaijan Premier League which has the ground of
John van den Brom is the manager of AZ Alkmaar which is managed by Robert E
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Denzil Antonio is the manager of Akron Metro Futbol Club Summit Assault, which
Akron Summit Assault's ground is in Akron, Ohio, United States
Sergio Mattarella is the leader of Italy where the capital is Rome and the language is
Pietro Grasso is the leader of Italy where the official language is Italian and the capital
Juventus FC is the champions of Serie A, where Juventus FC are the champions.
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is located in Mendrisio,
Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio was established in 1996 and has 600 students
The Dean of the Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is Mario Botta
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University
Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarva
Dr. G. P. Prabhukumar is the director of the Acharya Institute of Technology
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania where the Germans of Romania are
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Denmark was established in
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Denmark was established in
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was preceded by 1634: The Baltic War
Virginia DeMarce is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion, which has
Elizabeth II is the leader of the UK where the AIDS journal is published by Lipp
J.V. Jones is the author of A Fortress of Grey Ice, which is
Annie Dunne is the author of A Long Long Way which was preceded by The
A Severed Wasp, published in print, has the OCLC number 8805735,
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
A Severed Wasp is available in hardcover and has 388 pages. The OCLC number
Diane Duane is the author of A Wizard of Mars, which is available in
The academic discipline of Addiction (journal) is Addiction (journal) which has
Cornell University is affiliated with the Association of American Universities which is affiliate
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States where the capital is
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math., is
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math., was
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press in the United States, 
A Severed Wasp is from the United States, where Asian Americans are an 
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States where English is spok
Elizabeth II is the leader of the United Kingdom where David Cameron is a leader and
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States, where English is spoken and
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States, where English is spoken and
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Jones County, Texas,
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas. The ICAO
ENAIRE is the operating organisation for Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundel
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundel
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which uses the
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation for Allama Iqbal International Airport
The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation for Allama Iqbal International Airport
Andrews County Airport serves the city of Andrews, Texas, which is 973.0
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where the largest city
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, where the largest city is Houston and
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Luanda Province,
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Luanda Province,
The Flemish Department of Mobility and Public Works is the operating organisation for Antwerp International
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Wisconsin and serves the city of Apple
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Wisconsin which is part of Clayton
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is operated by the Civil Aviation Authority of New
Ashgabat International Airport is operated by Turkmenistan Airlines which is 211 metres above
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is the operating organisation for Atlantic City International
Philippe of Belgium is the leader of Belgium where German is spoken. Antwerp International
Atlantic City International Airport is located at Egg Harbor Township, Atlantic County, New Jersey,
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, part of
Aaron Bertram is a member of the Kids Imagine Nation and the Suburban 
Indie rock musician Aaron Deer is from Indiana, United States. He is a
Aaron Turner is a Black metal musician who is associated with Mamiffer and Mam
Aaron Turner is a Black metal musician who is associated with the band Twilight
Aaron Turner was born in Massachusetts and started performing in 1995. He is associated
Abradab was born in Katowice, Poland and started performing in 1994. Abradab
Ace Wilder was born on 23rd July 1982 in Sweden. He is a solo
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion, Paraguay, where Spanish is spok
Ahmet Ertegun died in the United States where African Americans are an 
Ahmet Ertegun was born in 1923 in Washington, D.C., United States
Alan Frew is a solo singer of rock music which originated from country music
Alan Frew is a solo singer from Newmarket, Ontario, Ontario,
Alex Day was born in the London Borough of Havering and started performing in 2006.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, which is led by the Labour Party
Alfredo Zitarrosa has a background as a solo singer and is 
Folk musician Alison O'Donnell, who started performing in 1963, is
Rhythm and blues musician Anders Osborne started performing in 1989 and is associated
Anders Osborne is a rock musician who is signed to the record label Okeh
Andra is a rhythm and blues singer who was born in Romania in 1986. Andra
Andra is a solo singer who was born in Campia Turzii in 1986. Andra
Trance musician Andrew Rayel was born in Chisinau, Moldova and began his
Andrew White, who started his career in 2003, is associated with Marry Banilow
Andrew Rayel is associated with Armin Van Buuren, Bobina, Mark Sixma
Drum and bass is a derivative of hip hop music which has its origins in
Spanish is the language spoken in Paraguay, where the leader is Juan Afara
Juan Afara is the leader of Paraguay, where the ethnic group is Mestizo
Rock musician Al Anderson is a member of the band NRBQ. Rock music originated
Aaron Turner plays the electric guitar for the band Twilight, which is associated
Spanish is spoken in Uruguay, where the leader is Raúl Fernando Sendic
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, which is led by Daniel Martinez
Alan Bean was born in Wheeler, Texas and served as a test pilot. Alan
Alan Shepard was born on 18 November 1923 in New Hampshire. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and graduated from NWC with a
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire, served as a crew member of
Alfred Worden was a backup pilot of Apollo 12 which was operated by
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on November 18, 1923. He was awarded the
Gregory L. Fenves is the president of the University of Texas at Austin, which
Elliot See was born in Dallas (Texas) and died in St Louis (St.
Elliot See was born in Dallas, Texas, graduated from the University of Texas at
Elliot See, who died in St. Louis, died in St. Louis,
Frank Borman was a commander of Apollo 8 which was operated by NASA.
Akeem Dent's debut team was the Atlanta Falcons, owned by Arthur
Al Kharaitiyat SC play in the Qatar Stars League which is managed by Amar
Aleksandr Chumakov died in Russia, where the leader is Valentina Matviyenko
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow FC which is managed by Rash
Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria and plays for A.
Alessio Romagnoli's current club is A.C. Milan which is managed
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Terek Grozny, which is managed by Rash
Thomas Doll is the manager of Ferencvarosi TC, whose home ground is Palo Seco
Akeem Ayers' debut team was the Tennessee Titans which play in the
20 Fenchurch Street is located in the United Kingdom, where the capital is London,
250 Delaware Avenue is located in Buffalo, New York and cost 110 million dollars
Rahm Emanuel is the leader of Chicago, which is part of DuPage County,
3Arena is owned by Live Nation Entertainment which is located in Dublin, which
Adisham Hall is located at St. Benedict's Monastery, Adisham,
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka, where the currency
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka which is led by Ran
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita, Akita,
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat, India, where
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat, India. The leader
Ampara Hospital is located in the Eastern Province of Sri Lanka which is led by
Julia Morgan, who was born in California, was the architect of Asilomar Conference Grounds
Asilomar Conference Grounds was designed by Julia Morgan, who was born in California and
Asilomar Conference Grounds, constructed in 1913, are located in Pacific Grove,
Asser Levy Public Baths, constructed in 1904, are located at 23rd
The Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, New York,
Birmingham City Council is the governing body of Birmingham City Council which is led by Andrew 
Addis Ababa Stadium is located in Addis Ababa, Ethiopia. The leader
John Roberts is the leader of the United States where English is spoken and African Americans
Joe Biden is a leader in the United States, where English is spoken and
(66063) 1998 RO1, formerly known as 1999 SN5, has an
(66391) 1999 KW4 has an epoch date of 14 July 2004 and an
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson, who died in Madison,
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson who graduated from the University of
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in the German
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in the German
107 Camilla, discovered by F Vilas, has an epoch date of December
107 Camilla was discovered by N.R. Pogson who was born in 
1089 Tama, formerly known as A919 HA; 1927 WB, has an
1097 Vicia has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and an orbital period
10 Hygiea has an epoch date of 27 June 2015 and an escape 
Abilene, Texas has a total area of 286.5 square kilometres and a
Abilene is part of Texas which is located in the United States, where
Albany is part of Georgia in the U.S. where English is spoken and
Albuquerque, New Mexico, has a total area of 486.2 square kilometres and
The United States House of Representatives is located at the United States Capitol, 
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, which is led by the Democratic Party of the
Anderson is located in Indiana and has a population density of 523.9 inhabitants
Antioch is part of Contra Costa County, California which is part of the San Francisco Bay
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana which is located in the United States
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States, where the capital is
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States, where African Americans
Austin is part of Williamson County, Texas, where the largest city is Round Rock
Austin is part of Williamson County, Texas, where the largest city is Houston and
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, where Anderson is the largest city. Alexandria
Fort Worth is the county seat of Tarrant County, Texas, where English is
Austin is the capital of Tarrant County, Texas, where the largest city is Fort
Austin is the capital of Texas, where Austin is the largest city. Austin is the
Albany is part of Dougherty County, Georgia, in the United States, where
Washington DC is the capital of the United States, where Americans are an ethnic group
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where the capital is
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where the leader is the
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Asian Americans are an 
Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where English is spoken
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Opelika is
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Barack Obama is
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where English is spoken
The President is the leader of the United States, where Asian Americans are an ethnic
Seattle is the largest city in Washington state, where Olympia is the capital. Auburn
Tim Brooke-Taylor is a character in Bananaman which was created by John
Duncan Rouleau, a national of the Americans, was created by Steven T
Bread, almonds, garlic, water and olive oil are the main ingredients of
Amatriciana sauce comes from the Lazio region of Italy. The main ingredients
Joko Widodo is the leader of Indonesia where the Indonesian rupiah is the
Arrabbiata sauce comes from Italy where the leader is Sergio Mattarella and
Arros negre is from the region of the Valencian Community which is led by X
Asam pedas is a food found in the Malay Peninsula, Malaysia, where
Arifin Zakaria is the leader of Malaysia which is the location of Asam pedas
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are fried chicken which is a
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Barack Obama is a leader
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Joe Biden is a leader
Baked Alaska comes from France where Carrie Lam is a politician and
Bandeja paisa is a Colombian dish from the Paisa region. The ingredient of Bande
Sponge cake is an ingredient in Barny Cakes which comes from France where
Barny cakes are created by Mondelez International, which was founded in Chicago
Bhajji comes from the Karnataka region of India where the leaders are T.S
Binignit is a dessert from the Visayas region of the Philippines where the main
Enrique Pena Nieto is the leader of Mexico where Spanish is spoken. Bio
Silvano Aureoles Conejo is the leader of Mexico where Spanish is spoken
Silvano Aureoles Conejo is the leader of Mexico which is the location of Bio
Joko Widodo is the leader of Indonesia, where the Indonesian language is spoken
Joko Widodo and Jusuf Kalla are leaders in Indonesia, where the capital is Jakarta
Pietro Grasso and Laura Boldrini are leaders in Italy where the demonym is Italian
Halimah Yacob is the leader of Java where the Banyumasan people are an 
Halimah Yacob is the leader of Java where the Banyumasan people are an 
Arabic is the official language of the Philippines where the Ilocano people and Igor
Tony Tan and Halimah Yacob are leaders in Singapore, where English is spoken
Felipe VI of Spain is the leader of Spain, where Spaniards are an ethnic
Felipe VI of Spain is the leader of Spain, where the currency is the Euro
Meyer Werft is the builder of the AIDAstella which has a top speed
The American Locomotive Company is the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has 
The AMC Matador, also known as American Motors Matador, is assembled in
The Alhambra, built by the Samuda Brothers, is 63800.0 millimetres long and
The Yuzhnoye Design Office is the manufacturer of the Antares rocket, which
The Yuzhnoye Design Office is the manufacturer of the Antares rocket, which
The Ariane 5, manufactured by Airbus Defence and Space, was launched at the
The European Space Agency is the manufacturer of the Ariane 5 which has a diameter
The Aston Martin Virage is a related means of transport to the Aston
The Atlas II originates from the United States where the Atlas II was launched from the
The Audi A1 has a 1.2 litre engine and a front-wheel drive layout
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person in Caterpillar Inc. which was found
The AIDAstella, built by Meyer Werft, is operated by AIDA Cruise
The Delta II is comparable to the Delta II rocket which was launched at the
The Delta II is comparable to the Delta II rocket which was launched at the
Joachim Gauck is a leader in Germany, where the capital is Berlin and the
Stanislaw Tillich is a leader in Germany where the demonym is Germans
The Minotaur V rocket and the Antares rocket are comparable to the Delta II
The Star Spangled Banner is the anthem of the United States which is the origin of
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County,
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan which has the capital city of Baku.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
Adenan Satem is a member of the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu
Olusegun Obasanjo was succeeded by Abdulsalami Abubakar, who was in
American Abraham A Ribicoff was born in Connecticut and died in New York City.
American Abraham A Ribicoff was married to Casey Ribicoff, who was m
Adam Holloway was born in Kent and graduated from Magdalene College, Cambridge
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte 
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte 
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte 
Albert B White was born in Bloomington, Maryland and died in Parkersburg, West
Alberto Teisaire died in Buenos Aires, where Spanish is spoken
Alberto Teisaire died in Buenos Aires, where Spanish is spoken
Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina on 1891-05-20. He was a
Alvah Sabin, who started his career on March 4, 1853, was from Vermont
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont and worked as the Secretary of State
Alvah Sabin, who died in Sycamore, Illinois, was a member of
Alvah Sabin, who died in Sycamore, Illinois, was a member of
Makis Voridis was the successor of Antonis Samaras, who was born in Athens
Doris Bures is a leader in Austria, where Austrian German is spoken
Mark Rutte is the leader of the Netherlands where the Euro is the currency and Ab
Gordon Marsden is the leader of A.F.C. Blackpool which is 
The manager of AEK Athens FC is Gus Poyet, who play in the Superleague 
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is located in Mendrisio,
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio in Ticino, Switzerland was established
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University
In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sardampfalli Radhakrishnan Road,
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with Visvesvaraya Technological University and
1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Alba Iulia, Romania. Romania's leader
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Denmark was established in
The book "A Long Long Way", published by Faber and Faber, is 
Annie Dunne and Faber published A Long Long Way, published by Faber
Above the Veil was followed by The Violet Keystone and Into Battle, which was
Cornell University is affiliated with the Association of American Universities which is affiliate
Cornell University is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land grant Universities which
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States where Barack Obama
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where English is spoken and the capital
The book Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States, where
Elizabeth II is the leader of the United Kingdom where English is spoken and David Cameron
Wolters Kluwer is the parent company of Lippincott Williams & Wilkins, which
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and
Alan Bean, who was born in Wheeler, Texas, was a crew member of
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on November 18, 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born on 18 November 1923 in New Hampshire. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born on 18 November 1923 in New Hampshire. He served as 
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire. He was awarded the American Defense Service
Edwin E. Aldrin Jr. is a fighter pilot who was born in Glen
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey on January 20th, 1930.
Buzz Aldrin, who graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963,
Elliot See was born in Dallas (Texas) and died in St Louis (St.
Elliot See was born on July 23, 1927 in Dallas, Texas. He attended the
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on the 17th of October 1933. He
Ahmet Davutoglu is the leader of Turkey, where the capital city is Ankara
Huseyin Butuner and Hilmi Guner are leaders in Azerbaijan where the leader is
The 14th New Jersey Volunteer Infantry Monument is located in the Monocacy National
The 14th New Jersey Volunteer Infantry Monument is located in the Monocacy National
The Federal Chancellor Johann Schneider-Ammann is the leader of Switzerland which is the location
In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sardampfalli Radhakrishnan Road,
Acharya Institute of Technology in Bangalore, India is affiliated with Visvesvaraya Technologi
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the Technical Campus status by the All India Council
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania, the capital of which is Buch
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University was established in 1928 and is
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is affiliated with the European
Alan Bean was born on March 15, 1932 in Wheeler, Texas. He was a test
Alan Bean was born in Wheeler, Texas and graduated from UT Austin in 1955 with
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on November 18, 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on November 18, 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on November 18, 1923. He was awarded the
Edwin E. Aldrin Jr. is a US national who was born in Glen Ridge
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, Essex County, New Jersey, which is
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey on January 20th, 1930.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey and graduated from MIT with 
Elliot See was born on July 23, 1927 in Dallas, Texas. He graduated
Elliot See was born on July 23, 1927 in Dallas, Texas. He graduated
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on the 17th of October 1933. He
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County,
Ahmet Davutoglu is the leader of Turkey where the currency is the 
Huseyin Butuner and Hilmi Guner designed the red granite and white marble
In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sardampfalli Radhakrishnan Road,
In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sardampfalli Radhakrishnan Road,
In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sardampfalli Radhakrishnan Road,
Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with Visvesvaraya Technological University in Belg
Mumbai is the largest city in India, which has Mahe to its northwest
1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Alba Iulia, Romania which is led by
In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sardampfalli Radhakrishnan Road,